Utah statutes.
76-3-203.6.    Enhanced penalty for certain offenses committed by prisoner.
(1)  As used in this section, "serving a sentence" means a prisoner is
sentenced and committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections, the
sentence has not been terminated or voided, and the prisoner:
(a)  has not been paroled; or
(b)  is in custody after arrest for a parole violation.
(2)  If the trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable doubt that a prisoner
serving a sentence for a capital felony or a first degree felony commits any
offense listed in Subsection (3), the court shall sentence the defendant to
life in prison without parole.  However, the court may sentence the defendant
to an indeterminate prison term of not less than 20 years and which may be for
life if the court finds that the interests of justice would best be served and
states the specific circumstances justifying the disposition on the record.
(3)  Offenses referred to in Subsection (2) are:
(a)  aggravated assault, Subsection 76-5-103(2);
(b)  mayhem, Section 76-5-105;
(c)  attempted murder, Section 76-5-203;
(d)  kidnapping, Section 76-5-301;
(e)  child kidnapping, Section 76-5-301.1;
(f)  aggravated kidnapping, Section 76-5-302;
(g)  rape, Section 76-5-402;
(h)  rape of a child, Section 76-5-402.1;
(i)  object rape, Section 76-5-402.2;
(j)  object rape of a child, Section 76-5-402.3;
(k)  forcible sodomy, Section 76-5-403;
(l)  sodomy on a child, Section 76-5-403.1;
(m)  aggravated sexual abuse of a child, Section 76-5-404.1;
(n)  aggravated sexual assault, Section 76-5-405;
(o)  aggravated arson, Section 76-6-103;
(p)  aggravated burglary, Section 76-6-203; and
(q)  aggravated robbery, Section 76-6-302.
(4)  The sentencing enhancement described in this section does not apply if:
(a)  the offense for which the person is being sentenced is:
(i)  a grievous sexual offense;
(ii)  child kidnapping, Section 76-5-301.1; or
(iii)  aggravated kidnapping, Section 76-5-302; and
(b)  applying the sentencing enhancement provided for in this section would
result in a lower maximum penalty than the penalty provided for under the
section that describes the offense for which the person is being sentenced.
